South Dakota, session 2026, SB121.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. The state treasurer shall transfer $8,212,497 from the trust fund for unclaimed
property, created in § 43-41B-24.4, to the general fund.
Section 2. There is appropriated $8,212,497 from the general fund, to the Office of the
Commissioner of School and Public Lands, for the replacement of the Richmond Lake dam and
spillway.
Section 3. The commissioner of school and public lands shall approve vouchers and the state
auditor shall draw warrants to pay expenditures authorized in this Act.
Section 4. Any amounts appropriated in this Act not lawfully expended or obligated shall
revert in accordance with the procedures prescribed in chapter 4-8.
Section 5. Whereas, this Act is necessary for the support of the state government and its
existing public institutions, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this Act shall be in
full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.

26.835.13 2 121
An Act to transfer moneys and make an appropriation for the replacement of the Richmond
Lake dam and spillway and to declare an emergency.
Received at this Executive Office
I certify that the attached Act originated in this _____ day of _____________,
the:
2026 at ____________M.
Senate as Bill No. 121
By
Secretary of the Senate for the Governor
The attached Act is hereby
approved this ________ day of
President of the Senate ______________, A.D., 2026
Attest:
Governor
Secretary of the Senate
STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA,
ss.
Office of the Secretary of State
Speaker of the House
Filed ____________, 2026
Attest: at _________ o'clock __M.
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of State
Senate Bill No. 121 By
File No. ____ Asst. Secretary of State
Chapter No. ______
SB121 ENROLLED